New Jersey, session 222, S957.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Director of the Division of Taxation shall engage in a continuous study of New Jersey business income taxes on business out-migration, business formation, and employment within the State.  In conducting the study, the director shall examine data available from corporation, partnership, and other New Jersey income tax returns the director deems appropriate. The director shall annually make a Tax Policy Impact Report consisting of the studys findings and recommendations, including whether any State or local tax laws or policies may be modified to improve the States business climate and decrease the financial impact of taxes on businesses residing in the State.  The director shall submit such report annually on or before January 1 to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.